public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ar isonse [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar isonse [abik]rokar
SFX A ar isonse [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar isonse [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar isonse [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar isonse [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar isonse [aeio]strar
SFX A ar isonse [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar isonse [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar isonse [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar isonse [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar isonse [aelo]var
SFX A ar isonse [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar isonse [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar isonse [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar isonse [agot]rejar
SFX A ar isonse [ai]erar
SFX A ar isonse [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar isonse [ail]gar
SFX A ar isonse [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar isonse [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar isonse [ailu]minar
SFX A ar isonse [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar isonse [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar isonse [als]tar
SFX A ar isonse [an]deđar
SFX A ar isonse [an]fraxar
SFX A ar isonse [an]kuerar
SFX A ar isonse [an]kuirar
SFX A ar isonse [ano]fegar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]niđar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rcar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rdar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rkar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rnar
SFX A ar isonse [ao]rsar
SFX A ar isonse [aou]rbar
SFX A ar isonse [aou]rgar
SFX A ar isonse [aou]rlar
SFX A ar isonse [aou]rtar
SFX A ar isonse [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar isonse [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar isonse [aux]nar
SFX A ar isonse [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar isonse [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar isonse [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar isonse [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar isonse [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar isonse [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar isonse [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar isonse [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar isonse [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar isonse [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar isonse [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar isonse [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar isonse [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar isonse [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar isonse [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar isonse [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar isonse [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar isonse [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar isonse [bou]rogar
SFX A ar isonse [bp]erlar
SFX A ar isonse [btv]ergar
SFX A ar isonse [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar isonse [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar isonse [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar isonse [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar isonse [dg]obar
SFX A ar isonse [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar isonse [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar isonse [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar isonse [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar isonse [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar isonse [eilox]mar
SFX A ar isonse [einoru]xar
SFX A ar isonse [einosu]car
SFX A ar isonse [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar isonse [eo]liđar
SFX A ar isonse [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar isonse [es]kotar
SFX A ar isonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar isonse [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar isonse [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar isonse [fm]eretar
SFX A ar isonse [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar isonse [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar isonse [gin]ritar
SFX A ar isonse [iln]trar
SFX A ar isonse [inru]jar
SFX A ar isonse [io]ntar
SFX A ar isonse [io]rkolar
SFX A ar isonse [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar isonse [ipu]lar
SFX A ar isonse [irst]umar
SFX A ar isonse [klt]ivar
SFX A ar isonse [kp]avejar
SFX A ar isonse [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar isonse [ln]etrar
SFX A ar isonse [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar isonse [mp]eritar
SFX A ar isonse [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar isonse [ns]erbar
SFX A ar isonse [ns]ervar
SFX A ar isonse [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar isonse [nsv]edar
SFX A ar isonse [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar isonse [op]ar
SFX A ar isonse [ox]longar
SFX A ar isonse [pt]resar
SFX A ar isonse [pt]rotar
SFX A ar isonse [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar isonse [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar isonse [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar isonse [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar isonse [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar isonse [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar isonse alar
SFX A ar isonse alienar
SFX A ar isonse amar
SFX A ar isonse arar
SFX A ar isonse bersajar
SFX A ar isonse bertonar
SFX A ar isonse bordeđar
SFX A ar isonse dar
SFX A ar isonse deramar
SFX A ar isonse derenar
SFX A ar isonse derivar
SFX A ar isonse derobar
SFX A ar isonse derokar
SFX A ar isonse derotar
SFX A ar isonse devorar
SFX A ar isonse dexeredar
SFX A ar isonse dexverxenar
SFX A ar isonse donar
SFX A ar isonse exerŧitar
SFX A ar isonse far
SFX A ar isonse fermentar
SFX A ar isonse fumar
SFX A ar isonse guernar
SFX A ar isonse inbaretar
SFX A ar isonse infervorar
SFX A ar isonse inkartonar
SFX A ar isonse interesar
SFX A ar isonse interkalar
SFX A ar isonse interkuerar
SFX A ar isonse interkuirar
SFX A ar isonse interlinear
SFX A ar isonse intermeđar
SFX A ar isonse interogar
SFX A ar isonse interpretar
SFX A ar isonse inŧercelar
SFX A ar isonse kalar
SFX A ar isonse kalefar
SFX A ar isonse kantar
SFX A ar isonse kolar
SFX A ar isonse korniđar
SFX A ar isonse kriolar
SFX A ar isonse kurvar
SFX A ar isonse lotar
SFX A ar isonse lumar
SFX A ar isonse lustrar
SFX A ar isonse maravejar
SFX A ar isonse menar
SFX A ar isonse meravejar
SFX A ar isonse merkantar
SFX A ar isonse merkantiđar
SFX A ar isonse međar
SFX A ar isonse mojar
SFX A ar isonse mudarar
SFX A ar isonse ojar
SFX A ar isonse okar
SFX A ar isonse ormeđar
SFX A ar isonse perdonar
SFX A ar isonse perfumar
SFX A ar isonse perifraxar
SFX A ar isonse periodar
SFX A ar isonse perkolar
SFX A ar isonse perkotar
SFX A ar isonse perletar
SFX A ar isonse perlustrar
SFX A ar isonse permudarar
SFX A ar isonse permutar
SFX A ar isonse perorar
SFX A ar isonse perpetrar
SFX A ar isonse perpetuar
SFX A ar isonse perseguitar
SFX A ar isonse personaliđar
SFX A ar isonse persugar
SFX A ar isonse pertegar
SFX A ar isonse pongar
SFX A ar isonse rajar
SFX A ar isonse ramar
SFX A ar isonse raxar
SFX A ar isonse redar
SFX A ar isonse rigolar
SFX A ar isonse rivar
SFX A ar isonse robar
SFX A ar isonse roersar
SFX A ar isonse rolar
SFX A ar isonse sajar
SFX A ar isonse scantiđar
SFX A ar isonse seguitar
SFX A ar isonse serajar
SFX A ar isonse skortegar
SFX A ar isonse sotolinear
SFX A ar isonse spergoŧar
SFX A ar isonse sperimentar
SFX A ar isonse sperlongar
SFX A ar isonse spernacar
SFX A ar isonse speronar
SFX A ar isonse sperđurar
SFX A ar isonse steriliđar
SFX A ar isonse sugar
SFX A ar isonse terapienar
SFX A ar isonse teraŧar
SFX A ar isonse termenar
SFX A ar isonse terminar
SFX A ar isonse terŧariolar
SFX A ar isonse tonar
SFX A ar isonse tormentar
SFX A ar isonse tuar
SFX A ar isonse vejar
SFX A ar isonse velar
SFX A ar isonse verdeđar
SFX A ar isonse vergiđar
SFX A ar isonse vergoñar
SFX A ar isonse verifegar
SFX A ar isonse verigolar
SFX A ar isonse verolar
SFX A ar isonse versar
SFX A ar isonse verxurar
SFX A ar isonse verđelar
SFX A ar isonse xberlefar
SFX A ar isonse xberlotar
SFX A ar isonse xberlumar
SFX A ar isonse xberxelar
SFX A ar isonse xelar
SFX A ar isonse xermojar
SFX A ar isonse xgoñar
SFX A ar isonse xlargiđar
SFX A ar isonse xmerdar
SFX A ar isonse xmerejar
SFX A ar isonse xmorgolar
SFX A ar isonse xnervađar
SFX A ar isonse xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar isonse đurar
SFX A ar isonse ŧercar
SFX A ar isonse ŧitar
SFX A ar iven/M [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar iven/M [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar iven/M [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar iven/M [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar iven/M [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar iven/M [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar iven/M [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar iven/M [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar iven/M [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar iven/M [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar iven/M [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar iven/M [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar iven/M [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar iven/M [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar iven/M [abik]rokar
SFX A ar iven/M [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar iven/M [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeio]strar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar iven/M [aelo]var
SFX A ar iven/M [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar iven/M [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar iven/M [agot]rejar
SFX A ar iven/M [ai]erar
SFX A ar iven/M [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar iven/M [ail]gar
SFX A ar iven/M [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar iven/M [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar iven/M [ailu]minar
SFX A ar iven/M [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar iven/M [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar iven/M [als]tar
SFX A ar iven/M [an]deđar
SFX A ar iven/M [an]fraxar
SFX A ar iven/M [an]kuerar
SFX A ar iven/M [an]kuirar
SFX A ar iven/M [ano]fegar
SFX A ar iven/M [ao]niđar
SFX A ar iven/M [ao]rcar
SFX A ar iven/M [ao]rdar
SFX A ar iven/M [ao]rdonar
