public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
inagrir/A
albiđar/A
inalokar/A
dexinamorar/A
dexanemar/A
arar/A
arđinar/A
arsar/A
subastar/A
aŧetar/A
exautorar/A
inaxiar/A
badinar/A
xbajar/A
inbakukar/A
inbalbar/A
xbalonar/A
rebaltar/A
dexbandir/A
banketar/A
barakar/A
inbarboɉar/A
inbarlukar/A
xbasar/A
inbàter/A
xbatocar/A
dexbautar/A
baxar/A
bekar/A
dexbendar/A
bersajar/A
inbéver/A
xbiakar/A
biasugar/A
xbimar/A
xbingolar/A
subisar/A
inbixakar/A
dexbocar/A
xbóɉer/A
xbokar/A
inboloñar/A
inbonar/A
inbonbegar/A
boraskar/A
xborfar/A
xboskar/A
dexbotonar/A
inboŧolar/A
xbragañar/A
bramar/A
inbrandir/A
inbraŧolar/A
breviar/A
brindar/A
xbrodacar/A
inbrokar/A
brondolar/A
brunar/A
xbruxar/A
xbufonar/A
inbusolar/A
inbuxar/A
dexbuxolar/A
incapetar/A
cavar/A
incénder/A
koncèñer/A
ascéñer/A
incepar/A
scikarar/A
incokar/A
scupar/A
redar/A
datar/A
dekorar/A
indeñar/A
devastar/A
diladiar/A
dexdíxer/A
indoar/A
dolorar/A
domenar/A
dopiar/A
dormir/A
adotar/A
radreŧar/A
indurir/A
tradúxer/A
đèmer/A
malđontar/A
ađornar/A
konđurar/A
efetuar/A
enpir/A
inerbar/A
esplòder/A
exasperar/A
exitar/A
kontrafar/A
tumefar/A
sfadigar/A
falkar/A
falŧar/A
sfangar/A
infarinar/A
infatuar/A
faxanar/A
fortifegar/A
purifegar/A
fegurar/A
defénder/A
ferir/A
trasferir/A
infervorar/A
fetonar/A
desfiamar/A
desfiapir/A
sfibrar/A
fifar/A
filar/A
filoxofar/A
sfinir/A
fiorir/A
desfisir/A
afitar/A
fluir/A
sfodrar/A
infoibar/A
refolar/A
sfondrar/A
forfar/A
trasformar/A
fornir/A
arfosar/A
frajar/A
frantonar/A
infrapolir/A
sfratar/A
parafraxar/A
desfregolar/A
desfríđer/A
infrixar/A
fruar/A
fugar/A
sfulminar/A
sfumegar/A
futiñar/A
dexgabanar/A
ingalbanar/A
xgalonar/A
xganbarar/A
xgañolar/A
xgarbelar/A
garofolir/A
dexgateɉar/A
xgaxolar/A
gloriar/A
xgoñar/A
gradelar/A
ingranerar/A
rengraŧiar/A
xgrénđer/A
xgriñaŧar/A
dexgropar/A
xguanŧar/A
gucar/A
inibir/A
inestar/A
inpresionar/A
interpretar/A
introitar/A
ɉaŧar/A
xɉonfar/A
skaciđar/A
kaɉar/A
kalkiđolar/A
kalumar/A
kontrakanbiar/A
skanpanar/A
kapar/A
skaponar/A
kareŧar/A
karpir/A
deskasar/A
katarar/A
skaturar/A
skavalar/A
inkietar/A
arkòjer/A
perkolar/A
rakomandar/A
konbàter/A
konpanegar/A
konteđar/A
konvoɉar/A
rekórer/A
inakòrđer/A
skortegar/A
inkoŧir/A
skrekolar/A
krivelar/A
krostoliđar/A
inkuartar/A
kufar/A
skulaŧar/A
kurvar/A
dexlanegar/A
lardar/A
lavar/A
legaliđar/A
arlevar/A
xlipegar/A
delirar/A
xlogar/A
xlovar/A
deluviar/A
inmagaxenar/A
xmaltir/A
maneđar/A
xmañuŧar/A
marɉiar/A
xmaserar/A
matriđar/A
mediar/A
dexmenar/A
xmeolar/A
eméter/A
mexurar/A
mirar/A
inmoɉar/A
momolar/A
xmónxer/A
xmorgar/A
moteđar/A
permudarar/A
remurkiar/A
xmuxegar/A
nauxear/A
xnetar/A
noliđar/A
nuvolir/A
ocar/A
olir/A
onɉar/A
subordenar/A
inosar/A
inpacolar/A
spaɉar/A
spaliŧar/A
pànder/A
papuŧar/A
sparecar/A
partikolariđar/A
spasiđar/A
patriar/A
spaventar/A
inpeɉar/A
inpenir/A
konpenetrar/A
repeonar/A
perorar/A
repèter/A
repeŧar/A
strapiantar/A
spiegar/A
piñorar/A
pirolar/A
spiŧar/A
poer/A
spolveriđar/A
propóner/A
inpontar/A
ponxetar/A
spòrxer/A
despotifar/A
reprénder/A
prexúmer/A
protokolar/A
spupilar/A
rabiar/A
rajar/A
ranpiñar/A
rausir/A
regatar/A
rexekar/A
riŧar/A
inrodolar/A
romanxinar/A
ropetar/A
dexruđenir/A
ruspar/A
skonsagrar/A
saldar/A
sanar/A
sasinar/A
scenxar/A
resekar/A
persèguer/A
inselar/A
sentir/A
sepelir/A
insestar/A
asiderar/A
sindikar/A
skainar/A
skarpelar/A
inskeletrar/A
skoinar/A
skríver/A
sofistegar/A
solfarar/A
soñar/A
sovenŧionar/A
spaŧar/A
ispesir/A
despinar/A
spoɉar/A
spudar/A
stalar/A
statuir/A
instigar/A
stiŧar/A
strafuñar/A
astrénđer/A
destropar/A
stufar/A
subiar/A
suparar/A
destabarar/A
takar/A
tanbaskar/A
tardigar/A
tavanar/A
ténder/A
tenpestar/A
tenutar/A
tèñer/A
inkontéñer/A
terminar/A
texorar/A
stironar/A
stonar/A
intorcar/A
kontòrđer/A
kontràer/A
tramacar/A
kontratar/A
destregolar/A
trikolar/A
intronbonar/A
tufar/A
ŧapar/A
ŧementar/A
ŧernir/A
reŧíder/A
antiŧipar/A
inŧopar/A
uñolar/A
stravakar/A
revangar/A
vastar/A
dexvegrar/A
vénder/A
veñir/A
arvèñer/A
verđelar/A
verolar/A
vesigar/A
xviar/A
rekonvínŧer/A
soravíver/A
vokaliđar/A
volturar/A
traxalir/A
xbiegar/A
inxeñar/A
xirandolar/A
xñakar/A
